Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-620
Dangerous dogs;
confiscation; when; costs.

Any dangerous dog may
be immediately confiscated by an animal control officer if the owner is in
violation of sections 54-617 to 54-624. The owner shall be responsible for
the reasonable costs incurred by the animal control authority for the care
of a dangerous dog confiscated by an animal control officer or for the destruction
of any dangerous dog if the action by the animal control authority is pursuant
to law and if the owner violated sections 54-617 to 54-624.

Laws 1989, LB 208, § 4;

Laws 2008, LB1055, § 19;

Laws 2009, LB494, § 9.